Connecticut, session 2026, SB00510.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) For taxable years
commencing on or after January 1, 2027, there is imposed a surcharge
on a taxpayer, excluding trusts or estates, whose Connecticut adjusted
gross income is equal to or greater than (1) one million dollars for an
individual who files a return under the federal income tax as an
unmarried individual or a married individual filing separately, (2) one
million six hundred thousand dollars for an individual who files a
return under the federal income tax as a head of household, and (3) two
million dollars for individuals who file a return under the federal
income tax as married individuals filing jointly. Such surcharge shall be
at the rate of one and seventy-five-hundredths per cent of the net gain
from the sale or exchange of capital assets, as determined for federal
income tax purposes. The surcharge shall be in addition to any other tax,
fee or surcharge for which the taxpayer is liable, except that any such
taxpayer shall be allowed a one-time exclusion for the net gain from the
sale of the taxpayer's primary residence in the state or from the sale of
the taxpayer's ownership interest in a business.
(b) Each taxpayer subject to the surcharge shall file a report with the
Commissioner of Revenue Services, in such form and containing such
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 510
information as the commissioner prescribes, on or before the fifteenth
day of the fourth month following the close of the taxpayer's taxable
year. Such report shall accurately set forth the amount of the net gain
calculated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section for the preceding
taxable year and the amount of the taxpayer's surcharge liability for
such year. A taxpayer required to file a report shall, without assessment,
notice or demand, pay any surcharge due thereon to the commissioner
on or before the date specified in this subsection, determined without
regard to any extension of time for filing the report.
(c) If any person fails to pay the amount of the surcharge reported
due on a report within the time specified, there shall be imposed a
penalty equal to ten per cent of such amount due and unpaid, or fifty
dollars, whichever is greater. Such amount shall bear interest at the rate
of one per cent per month or fraction thereof, from the due date of such
surcharge until the date of payment. Subject to the provisions of section
12-3a of the general statutes, the commissioner may waive all or part of
the penalties provided under this section when it is proven to the
commissioner's satisfaction that the failure to pay any surcharge was
due to reasonable cause and was not intentional or due to neglect.
(d) The provisions of sections 12-550 to 12-554, inclusive, and section
12-555a of the general statutes shall apply to the provisions of this
section in the same manner and with the same force and effect as if the
language of said sections had been incorporated in full into this section
and had expressly referred to the surcharge under this section, except to
the extent that any provision is inconsistent with a provision in this
section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(b), "such return" was changed to "such report" for
consistency.
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 510
FIN Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3